Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.060

District judges have jurisdiction.

The proceedings provided for in this chapter may be had before district judges in all cases within their jurisdiction.

[ 1987 c 202 s 135; 1891 c 42 s 4; Code 1881 s 642; 1877 p 134 s 644; 1869 p 150 s 582; 1854 p 210 s 424; RRS s 783.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.